Wyoming, session 2025, SF0172.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 33-25-201 and 33-25-202 are created
to read:

ARTICLE 2
PHYSICAL THERAPY LICENSURE COMPACT
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196

33-25-201. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the
"Physical Therapy Licensure Compact."

33-25-202. Compact provisions generally.

SECTION 1
PURPOSE

The purpose of this compact is to facilitate interstate
practice of physical therapy with the goal of improving
public access to physical therapy services. The practice of
physical therapy occurs in the state where the
patient/client is located at the time of the patient/client
encounter. The compact preserves the regulatory authority
of states to protect public health and safety through the
current system of state licensure. This compact is designed
to achieve the following objectives:

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
1. Increase public access to physical therapy
services by providing for the mutual recognition of other
member state licenses;

2. Enhance the states' ability to protect the
public's health and safety;

3. Encourage the cooperation of member states in
regulating multi-state physical therapy practice;

4. Support spouses of relocating military members;

5. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative
and disciplinary information between member states; and

6. Allow a remote state to hold a provider of
services with a compact privilege in that state accountable
to that state's practice standards.

SECTION 2
DEFINITIONS

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
As used in this compact, and except as otherwise provided,
the following definitions shall apply:

1. "Active duty military" means full-time duty status
in the active uniformed service of the United States,
including members of the National Guard and Reserve on
active duty orders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. Chapter 1209 and
1211;

2. "Adverse action" means disciplinary action taken
by a physical therapy licensing board based upon
misconduct, unacceptable performance or a combination of
both;

3. "Alternative program" means a non-disciplinary
monitoring or practice remediation process approved by a
physical therapy licensing board. This includes, but is not
limited to, substance abuse issues;

4. "Compact privilege" means the authorization
granted by a remote state to allow a licensee from another
member state to practice as a physical therapist or work as
a physical therapist assistant in the remote state under
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
its laws and rules. The practice of physical therapy occurs
in the member state where the patient/client is located at
the time of the patient/client encounter;

5. "Continuing competence" means a requirement, as a
condition of license renewal, to provide evidence of
participation in, and/or completion of, educational and
professional activities relevant to practice or area of
work;

6. "Data system" means a repository of information
about licensees, including examination, licensure,
investigative, compact privilege and adverse action;

7. "Encumbered license" means a license that a
physical therapy licensing board has limited in any way;

8. "Executive board" means a group of directors
elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the
powers granted to them by, the commission;

9. "Home state" means the member state that is the
licensee's primary state of residence;
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196

10. "Investigative information" means information,
records, and documents received or generated by a physical
therapy licensing board pursuant to an investigation;

11. "Jurisprudence requirement" means the assessment
of a person's knowledge of the laws and rules governing the
practice of physical therapy in a state;

12. "Licensee" means a person who currently holds an
authorization from the state to practice as a physical
therapist or to work as a physical therapist assistant;

13. "Member state" means a state that has enacted the
compact;

14. "Party state" means any member state in which a
licensee holds a current license or compact privilege or is
applying for a license or compact privilege;

15. "Physical therapist" means a person who is
licensed by a state to practice physical therapy;

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
16. "Physical therapist assistant" means a person who
is licensed/certified by a state and who assists a physical
therapist in selected components of physical therapy;

17. "Physical therapy," "physical therapy practice,"
and "the practice of physical therapy" mean the care and
services provided by or under the direction and supervision
of a licensed physical therapist;

18. "Physical Therapy Compact Commission" or
"commission" means the national administrative body whose
membership consists of all states that have enacted the
compact;

19. "Physical therapy licensing board" or "licensing
board" means the agency of a state that is responsible for
the licensing and regulation of physical therapists and
physical therapist assistants;

20. "Remote state" means a member state other than
the home state, where a licensee is exercising or seeking
to exercise the compact privilege;

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
21. "Rule" means a regulation, principle or directive
promulgated by the commission that has the force of law;

22. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district
or territory of the United States of America that regulates
the practice of physical therapy.

SECTION 3
STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT

A. To participate in the compact, a state shall:

1. Participate fully in the commission's data
system, including using the commission's unique identifier
as defined in rules;

2. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and
investigating complaints about licensees;

3. Notify the commission, in compliance with the
terms of the compact and rules, of any adverse action or
the availability of investigative information regarding a
licensee;
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196

4. Fully implement a criminal background check
requirement, within a time frame established by rule, by
receiving the results of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation record search on criminal background checks
and use the results in making licensure decisions in
accordance with section 3.B.;

5. Comply with the rules of the commission;

6. Utilize a recognized national examination as
a requirement for licensure pursuant to the rules of the
commission; and

7. Have continuing competence requirements as a
condition for license renewal.

B. Upon adoption of this statute, the member state
shall have the authority to obtain biometric-based
information from each physical therapy licensure applicant
and submit this information to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a criminal background check in accordance
with 28 U.S.C. § 534 and 42 U.S.C. § 14616.
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196

C. A member state shall grant the compact privilege
to a licensee holding a valid unencumbered license in
another member state in accordance with the terms of the
compact and rules.

D. Member states may charge a fee for granting a
compact privilege.

SECTION 4
COMPACT PRIVILEGE

A. To exercise the compact privilege under the terms
and provisions of the compact, the licensee shall:

1. Hold a license in the home state;

2. Have no encumbrance on any state license;

3. Be eligible for a compact privilege in any
member state in accordance with Section 4.D., G. and H.;

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
4. Have not had any adverse action against any
license or compact privilege within the previous two (2)
years;

5. Notify the commission that the licensee is
seeking the compact privilege within a remote state(s);

6. Pay any applicable fees, including any state
fee, for the compact privilege;

7. Meet any jurisprudence requirements
established by the remote state(s) in which the licensee is
seeking a compact privilege; and

8. Report to the commission adverse action taken
by any non-member state within thirty (30) days from the
date the adverse action is taken.

B. The compact privilege is valid until the
expiration date of the home license. The licensee shall
comply with the requirements of section 4.A. to maintain
the compact privilege in the remote state.

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
C. A licensee providing physical therapy in a remote
state under the compact privilege shall function within the
laws and regulations of the remote state.

D. A licensee providing physical therapy in a remote
state is subject to that state's regulatory authority. A
remote state may, in accordance with due process and that
state's laws, remove a licensee's compact privilege in the
remote state for a specific period of time, impose fines,
and/or take any other necessary actions to protect the
health and safety of its citizens. The licensee is not
eligible for a compact privilege in any state until the
specific time for removal has passed and all fines are
paid.

E. If a home state license is encumbered, the
licensee shall lose the compact privilege in any remote
state until the following occur:

1. The home state license is no longer
encumbered; and

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
2. Two (2) years have elapsed from the date of
the adverse action.

F. Once an encumbered license in the home state is
restored to good standing, the licensee shall meet the
requirements of section 4.A. to obtain a compact privilege
in any remote state.

G. If a licensee's compact privilege in any remote
state is removed, the person shall lose the compact
privilege in any remote state until the following occur:

1. The specific period of time for which the
compact privilege was removed has ended;

2. All fines have been paid; and

3. Two (2) years have elapsed from the date of
the adverse action.

H. Once the requirements of section 4.G. have been
met, the license shall meet the requirements in section
4.A. to obtain a compact privilege in a remote state.
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196

SECTION 5
ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY PERSONNEL OR THEIR SPOUSES

A licensee who is active duty military or is the spouse of
a person who is active duty military may designate one (1)
of the following as the home state:

A. Home of record;

B. Permanent Change of Station (PCS); or

C. State of current residence if it is different than
the PCS state or home of record.

SECTION 6
ADVERSE ACTIONS

A. A home state shall have exclusive power to impose
adverse action against a license issued by the home state.

B. A home state may take adverse action based on the
investigative information of a remote state, so long as the
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
home state follows its own procedures for imposing adverse
action.

C. Nothing in this compact shall override a member
state's decision that participation in an alternative
program may be used in lieu of adverse action and that such
participation shall remain non-public if required by the
member state's laws. Member states shall require licensees
who enter any alternative programs in lieu of discipline to
agree not to practice in any other member state during the
term of the alternative program without prior authorization
from such other member state.

D. Any member state may investigate actual or alleged
violations of the statutes and rules authorizing the
practice of physical therapy in any other member state in
which a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant
holds a license or compact privilege.

E. A remote state shall have the authority to:

1. Take adverse actions as set forth in section
4.D. against a licensee's compact privilege in the state;
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196

2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and
investigations that require the attendance and testimony of
witnesses, and the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued
by a physical therapy licensing board in a party state for
the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and/or the
production of evidence from another party state, shall be
enforced in the latter state by any court of competent
jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of
that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings
pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any
witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees
required by the service statutes of the state where the
witnesses and/or evidence are located; and

3. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover
from the licensee the costs of investigations and
disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action
taken against that licensee.

F. Joint Investigations:

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
1. In addition to the authority granted to a
member state by its respective physical therapy practice
act or other applicable state law, a member state may
participate with other member states in joint
investigations of licensees.

2. Member states shall share any investigative,
litigation or compliance materials in furtherance of any
joint or individual investigation initiated under the
compact.

SECTION 7
ESTABLISHMENT OF THE PHYSICAL THERAPY COMPACT COMMISSION

A. The compact member states hereby create and
establish a joint public agency known as the Physical
Therapy Compact Commission:

1. The commission is an instrumentality of the
compact states.

2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by
or against the commission shall be brought solely and
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the
principal office of the commission is located. The
commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to
the extent it adopts or consents to participate in
alternative dispute resolution proceedings.

3. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to
be a waiver of sovereign immunity.

B. Membership, voting and meetings:

1. Each member state shall have and be limited
to one (1) delegate selected by that member state's
licensing board.

2. The delegate shall be a current member of the
licensing board, who is a physical therapist, physical
therapist assistant, public member or the board
administrator.

3. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from
office as provided by the law of the state from which the
delegate is appointed.
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196

4. The member state board shall fill any vacancy
occurring in the commission.

5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1)
vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation
of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to
participate in the business and affairs of the commission.

6. A delegate shall vote in person or by such
other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may
provide for delegates' participation in meetings by
telephone or other means of communication.

7. The commission shall meet at least once
during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be
held as set forth in the bylaws.

C. The commission shall have the following powers and
duties:

1. Establish the fiscal year of the commission;

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
2. Establish bylaws;

3. Maintain its financial records in accordance
with the bylaws;

4. Meet and take such actions as are consistent
with the provisions of this compact and the bylaws;

5. Promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and
coordinate implementation and administration of this
compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law
and shall be binding in all member states;

6. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or
actions in the name of the commission, provided that the
standing of any state physical therapy licensing board to
sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;

7. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;

8. Borrow, accept or contract for services of
personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a
member state;
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196

9. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers,
fix compensation, define duties, grant such persons
appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the
compact and to establish the commission's personnel
policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest,
qualifications of personnel and other related personnel
matters;

10. Accept any and all appropriate donations and
grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and
services and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same,
provided that at all times the commission shall avoid any
appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of interest;

11. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or
donations of or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use any
property, real, personal or mixed, provided that at all
times the commission shall avoid any appearance of
impropriety;

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
12. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease,
exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of any property
real, personal or mixed;

13. Establish a budget and make expenditures;

14. Borrow money;

15. Appoint committees, including standing
committees composed of members, state regulators, state
legislators or their representatives and consumer
representatives, and such other interested persons as may
be designated in this compact and the bylaws;

16. Provide and receive information from and
cooperate with law enforcement agencies;

17. Establish and elect an executive board; and

18. Perform such other functions as may be
necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this
compact consistent with the state regulation of physical
therapy licensure and practice.
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196

D. The executive board. The executive board shall
have the power to act on behalf of the commission according
to the terms of this compact:

1. The executive board shall be composed of nine
(9) members:

a. Seven (7) voting members who are elected
by the commission from the current membership of the
commission;

b. One (1) ex-officio, nonvoting member
from the recognized national physical therapy professional
association; and

c. One (1) ex-officio, nonvoting member
from the recognized membership organization of the physical
therapy licensing boards.

2. The ex-officio members shall be selected by
their respective organizations.

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
3. The commission may remove any member of the
executive board as provided in bylaws.

4. The executive board shall meet at least
annually.

5. The executive board shall have the following
duties and responsibilities:

a. Recommend to the entire commission
changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to this compact
legislation, fees paid by compact member states such as
annual dues and any commission compact fee charged to
licensees for the compact privilege;

b. Ensure compact administration services
are appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise;

c. Prepare and recommend the budget;

d. Maintain financial records on behalf of
the commission;

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
e. Monitor compact compliance of member
states and provide compliance reports to the commission;

f. Establish additional committees as
necessary; and

g. Other duties as provided in rules or
bylaws.

E. Meetings of the commission:

1. All meetings shall be open to the public, and
public notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner
as required under the rulemaking provisions in section 9.

2. The commission or the executive board or
other committees of the commission may convene in a closed,
non-public meeting if the commission or executive board or
other committees of the commission shall discuss:

a. Non-compliance of a member state with
its obligations under the compact;

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
b. The employment, compensation, discipline
or other matters, practices or procedures related to
specific employees or other matters related to the
commission's internal personnel practices and procedures;

c. Current, threatened or reasonably
anticipated litigation;

d. Negotiation of contracts for the
purchase, lease or sale of goods, services or real estate;

e. Accusing any person of a crime or
formally censuring any person;

f. Disclosure of trade secrets or
commercial or financial information that is privileged or
confidential;

g. Disclosure of information of a personal
nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly
unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
h. Disclosure of investigative records
compiled for law enforcement purposes;

i. Disclosure of information related to any
investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or for
use of the commission or other committee charged with
responsibility of investigation or determination of
compliance issues pursuant to the compact; or

j. Matters specifically exempted from
disclosure by federal or member state statute.

3. If a meeting or portion of a meeting is
closed pursuant to this provision, the commission's legal
counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be
closed and shall reference each relevant exempting
provision.

4. The commission shall keep minutes that fully
and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and
shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken,
and the reasons therefore, including a description of the
views expressed. All documents considered in connection
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All
minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain
under seal subject to release by a majority vote of the
commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

F. Financing of the commission:

1. The commission shall pay, or provide for the
payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment,
organization and ongoing activities.

2. The commission may accept any and all
appropriate revenue sources, donations and grants of money,
equipment, supplies, materials and services.

3. The commission may levy on and collect an
annual assessment from each member state or impose fees on
other parties to cover the cost of the operations and
activities of the commission and its staff, which shall be
in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as
approved each year for which revenue is not provided by
other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall
be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all
member states.

4. The commission shall not incur obligations of
any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the
same nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of
the member states, except by and with the authority of the
member state.

5. The commission shall keep accurate accounts
of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and
disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the
audit and accounting procedures established under its
bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds
handled by the commission shall be audited yearly by a
certified or licensed public accountant and the report of
the audit shall be included in and become part of the
annual report of the commission.

G. Qualified immunity, defense and indemnification:

1. The members, officers, executive director,
employees and representatives of the commission shall be
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
immune from suit and liability, either personally or in
their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or
loss of property or personal injury or other civil
liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error or omission that occurred or that the person
against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that
nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any
such person from suit and/or liability for any damage,
loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person.

2. The commission shall defend any member,
officer, executive director, employee or representative of
the commission in any civil action seeking to impose
liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error
or omission that occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties or responsibilities or that the person
against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that
nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
from retaining his or her own counsel, and provided
further, that the actual or alleged act, error or omission
did not result from that person's intentional or willful or
wanton misconduct.

3. The commission shall indemnify and hold
harmless any member, officer, executive director, employee
or representative of the commission for the amount of any
settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising
out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that
occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties
or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable
basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the
actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result
from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of
that person.

SECTION 8
DATA SYSTEM

A. The commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance and utilization of a coordinated database and
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
reporting system containing licensure, adverse action and
investigative information on all licensed persons in member
states.

B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law
to the contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform data
set to the data system on all persons to whom this compact
is applicable as required by the rules of the commission,
including:

1. Identifying information;

2. Licensure data;

3. Adverse actions against a license or compact
privilege;

4. Non-confidential information related to
alternative program participation;

5. Any denial of application for licensure and
the reason(s) for such denial; and

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
6. Other information that may facilitate the
administration of this compact, as determined by the rules
of the commission.

C. Investigative information pertaining to a licensee
in any member state shall only be available to other party
states.

D. The commission shall promptly notify all member
states of any adverse action taken against a licensee or a
person applying for a license. Adverse action information
pertaining to a licensee in any member state shall be
available to any other member state.

E. Member states contributing information to the data
system may designate information that shall not be shared
with the public without the express permission of the
contributing state.

F. Any information submitted to the data system that
is subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the
member state contributing the information shall be removed
from the data system.
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196

SECTION 9
RULEMAKING

A. The commission shall exercise its rulemaking
powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section
and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments
shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule
or amendment.

B. If a majority of the legislatures of the member
states rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or
resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact
within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the rule,
then such rule shall have no further force and effect in
any member state.

C. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted
at a regular or special meeting of the commission.

D. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule
or rules by the commission, and at least thirty (30) days
in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
considered and voted upon, the commission shall file a
notice of proposed rulemaking:

1. On the website of the commission or other
publicly accessible platform; and

2. On the website of each member state physical
therapy licensing board or other publicly accessible
platform or the publication in which each state would
otherwise publish proposed rules.

E. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:

1. The proposed time, date and location of the
meeting in which the rule will be considered and voted
upon;

2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment
and the reason for the proposed rule;

3. A request for comments on the proposed rule
from any interested person; and

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
4. The manner in which interested persons may
submit notice to the commission of their intention to
attend the public hearing and any written comments.

F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the
commission shall allow persons to submit written data,
facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made
available to the public.

G. The commission shall grant an opportunity for a
public hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment if a
hearing is requested by:

1. At least twenty-five (25) persons;

2. A state or federal governmental subdivision
or agency; or

3. An association having at least twenty-five
(25) members.

H. If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or
amendment, the commission shall publish the place, time and
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
date of the scheduled public hearing. If the hearing is
held via electronic means, the commission shall publish the
mechanism for access to the electronic hearing.

1. All persons wishing to be heard at the
hearing shall notify the executive director of the
commission or other designated member in writing of their
desire to appear and testify at the hearing not less than
five (5) business days before the scheduled date of the
hearing.

2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner
providing each person who wishes to comment a fair and
reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing.

3. All hearings shall be recorded. A copy of the
recording shall be made available on request.

4. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be
grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings
required by this section.

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
I. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the
close of business on the scheduled hearing date if the
hearing was not held, the commission shall consider all
written and oral comments received.

J. If no written notice of intent to attend the
public hearing by interested parties is received, the
commission may proceed with promulgation of the proposed
rule without a public hearing.

K. The commission shall, by majority vote of all
members, take final action on the proposed rule and shall
determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on
the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.

L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without
prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided
that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the
compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied
to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event
later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule
is one (1) that shall be adopted immediately in order to:

1. Meet an imminent threat to public health,
safety or welfare;

2. Prevent a loss of commission or member state
funds;

3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an
administrative rule that is established by federal law or
rule; or

4. Protect public health and safety.

M. The commission or an authorized committee of the
commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted
rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical
errors, errors in format, errors in consistency or
grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be
posted on the website of the commission. The revision shall
be subject to challenge by any person for a period of
thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a
material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in
writing and delivered to the chair of the commission prior
to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made,
the revision shall take effect without further action. If
the revision is challenged, the revision shall not take
effect without the approval of the commission.

SECTION 10
OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ENFORCEMENT

A. Oversight:

1. The executive, legislative and judicial
branches of state government in each member state shall
enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to effectuate the compact's purposes and
intent. The provisions of this compact and the rules
promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law.

2. All courts shall take judicial notice of the
compact and the rules in any judicial or administrative
proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
matter of this compact which may affect the powers,
responsibilities or actions of the commission.

3. The commission shall be entitled to receive
service of process in any such proceeding and shall have
standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all
purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the
commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the
commission, this compact or promulgated rules.

B. Default, technical assistance and termination:

1. If the commission determines that a member
state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations
or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated
rules, the commission shall:

a. Provide written notice to the defaulting
state and other member states of the nature of the default,
the proposed means of curing the default and/or any other
action to be taken by the commission; and

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
b. Provide remedial training and specific
technical assistance regarding the default.

2. If a state in default fails to cure the
default, the defaulting state may be terminated from the
compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
member states, and all rights, privileges and benefits
conferred by this compact may be terminated on the
effective date of termination. A cure of the default does
not relieve the offending state of obligations or
liabilities incurred during the period of default.

3. Termination of membership in the compact
shall be imposed only after all other means of securing
compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend
or terminate shall be given by the commission to the
governor, the majority and minority leaders of the
defaulting state's legislature and each of the member
states.

4. A state that has been terminated is
responsible for all assessments, obligations and
liabilities incurred through the effective date of
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
termination, including obligations that extend beyond the
effective date of termination.

5. The commission shall not bear any costs
related to a state that is found to be in default or that
has been terminated from the compact unless agreed upon in
writing between the commission and the defaulting state.

6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of
the commission by petitioning the United States District
Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district
where the commission has its principal offices. The
prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.

C. Dispute resolution:

1. Upon request by a member state, the
commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the
compact that arise among member states and between member
and non-member states.

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
2. The commission shall promulgate a rule
providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution
for disputes as appropriate.

D. Enforcement:

1. The commission, in the reasonable exercise of
its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of
this compact.

2. By majority vote, the commission may initiate
legal action in the United States District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the
commission has its principal offices against a member state
in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of the
compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief
sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In
the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing
member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorney's fees.

3. The remedies herein shall not be the
exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
pursue any other remedies available under federal or state
law.

SECTION 11
DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR
PHYSICAL THERAPY PRACTICE AND ASSOCIATED RULES, WITHDRAWAL
AND AMENDMENT

A. The compact shall come into effect on the date the
compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth member
state. The provisions, which become effective at that time,
shall be limited to the powers granted to the commission
relating to assembly and the promulgation of rules.
Thereafter, the commission shall meet and exercise
rulemaking powers necessary to the implementation and
administration of the compact.

B. Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the
commission's initial adoption of the rules shall be subject
to the rules as they exist on the date on which the compact
becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been
previously adopted by the commission shall have the full
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes law
in that state.

C. Any member state may withdraw from this compact by
enacting a statute repealing the same.

1. A member state's withdrawal shall not take
effect until six (6) months after enactment of the
repealing statute.

2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing
requirement of the withdrawing state's physical therapy
licensing board to comply with the investigative and
adverse action reporting requirements of this act prior to
the effective date of withdrawal.

D. Nothing contained in this compact shall be
construed to invalidate or prevent any physical therapy
licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement
between a member state and a non-member state that does not
conflict with the provisions of this compact.

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
E. This compact may be amended by the member states.
No amendment to this compact shall become effective and
binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the
laws of all member states.

SECTION 12
CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

This compact shall be liberally construed so as to
effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this
compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause,
sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be
contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the
United States or the applicability thereof to any
government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid,
the validity of the remainder of this compact and the
applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or
circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact
shall be held contrary to the constitution of any party
state, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as
to the remaining party states and in full force and effect
as to the party state affected as to all severable matters.

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
Section 2. W.S. 33-25-101(a)(i)(intro), (ii), (vi),
(x), by creating a new paragraph (xii) and by renumbering
(xii) as (xiii), 33-25-102(a)(intro), (b), (d) and (f)(i),
33-25-104(a)(ii) through (v) and (vii) through (ix),
33-25-106(a), 33-25-107(b), 33-25-111(a)(intro), (i),
(ii)(A), (vii), (xiii), (xv), (xvi) and (b), 33-25-112(b),
33-25-113(a) and 33-2-116(a)(ii) and (iii) are amended to
read:

33-25-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Physical therapy" or "physiotherapy" means
the care and services provided by or under the direction
and supervision of a physical therapist or physiotherapist
who is licensed pursuant to this act or who has been
granted a compact privilege. The practice of physical
therapy includes:

(ii) "Physical therapist" or "physiotherapist"
means a person who is licensed to practice physical therapy
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
pursuant to this act or who has been granted a compact
privilege;

(vi) "Physical therapy services" means the care
and services provided by a licensed physical therapist or a
certified physical therapist assistant pursuant to this act
or by a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant
who has been granted a compact privilege;

(x) "Physical therapy aide" means a person
trained under the direction of a licensed physical
therapist or a physical therapist who has been granted a
compact privilege who performs designated and supervised
components of care related to physical therapy;

(xii) "Compact privilege" means the privilege to
practice as a physical therapist or physical therapist
assistant pursuant to the physical therapist licensure
compact under W.S. 33-25-201 and 33-25-202;

(xii)(xiii) "This act" means W.S. 33-25-101
through 33-25-116.

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
33-25-102. Practice of physical therapy; license or
certificate required; exceptions; false representations.

(a) No individual shall engage in the practice of
physical therapy services nor hold himself out as being
able to practice physical therapy in the state of Wyoming
unless he is licensed or certified in accordance with the
provisions of this act or has been granted a compact
privilege and such license, compact privilege or
certificate is in good standing and has not been suspended
or revoked, except nothing in this act shall:

(b) No individual or business entity shall use in
connection with his name or business, the words physical
therapy, physical therapist, physiotherapy,
physiotherapist, registered physical therapist, licensed
physical therapist, doctor of physical therapy or the
letters P.T., L.P.T., R.P.T., D.P.T., M.P.T., M.S.P.T. or
any other words, letters, abbreviations or insignia
indicating or implying directly or indirectly that physical
therapy is provided or supplied in any manner unless the
person is a physical therapist licensed to practice in
accordance with this act or has been granted a compact
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
privilege. No individual or business entity shall use the
title physical therapist assistant, the letters P.T.A. or
any other words, abbreviations or insignia in connection
with his name to indicate or imply that the person is a
physical therapist assistant unless the person is certified
as a physical therapist assistant in accordance with this
act or has been granted a compact privilege.

(d) Physical therapy aides may perform patient care
activities as defined by the board under the on-site
supervision of a licensed physical therapist, or a
certified physical therapist assistant or a physical
therapist or physical therapist assistant who has been
granted a compact privilege.

(f) The following persons are exempt from the
licensure and certification requirements of this act:

(i) A person in a professional education program
approved by the board who is satisfying supervised clinical
education requirements related to the person's physical
therapist education while under on-site supervision of a
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
licensed physical therapist or a physical therapist who has
been granted a compact privilege;

33-25-104. Board of physical therapy; powers and
duties generally.

(a) The board shall have the following powers and
duties:

(ii) Revoke, suspend, restrict, condition,
reprimand, refuse to renew or refuse to issue the license
of any physical therapist, or the certificate of any
physical therapy assistant or applicant pursuant to W.S.
33-25-111 or the compact privilege to practice of any
physical therapist or physical therapy assistant;

(iii) Maintain current records listing the name
of every licensed physical therapist, and certified
physical therapist assistant, physical therapist and
physical therapist assistant granted a compact privilege in
this state, his business and home address, the date and
number of his license or certification and, if known, his
area or expertise, professional interest or credentials;
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196

(iv) Adopt rules and regulations to implement
this act and the physical therapy licensure compact under
W.S. 33-25-201 and 33-25-202;

(v) Within the limitations provided in W.S.
33-25-113(a), set and from time to time revise fees as
necessary to recover the expenses of administering this act
and the physical therapy licensure compact under W.S.
33-25-201 and 33-25-202;

(vii) Conduct investigations, hearings and
proceedings concerning alleged violations of this act, and
board rules and regulations and the physical therapy
licensure compact under W.S. 33-25-201 and 33-25-202;

(viii) Inspect or duplicate patient medical
records which relate to any alleged acts of misconduct,
documented in the form of a formal complaint filed with the
board, against any license, compact privilege or
certificate holder and as authorized by the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act for regulatory
bodies;
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196

(ix) Report final disciplinary action taken
against a license, compact privilege or certificate holder
to the extent authorized or required by other state and
federal laws.

33-25-106. Examinations.

(a) All applicants shall be required to pass an
examination prior to their being licensed or certified as
provided in this article unless otherwise exempted from
examination pursuant to W.S. 33-25-108 or the physical
therapy licensure compact under W.S. 33-25-201 and
33-25-202. The examinations shall be approved by the board.

33-25-107. License; certificate of registration.

(b) Each individual licensed as a physical therapist
or who has been granted a compact privilege in this state
is authorized to use the letters "P.T." after his name, and
may represent himself to the public as a licensed physical
therapist.

SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
33-25-111. Discipline; denial or suspension of
license or certificate; grounds.

(a) The board may revoke, suspend, restrict,
condition, reprimand, refuse to issue or refuse to renew
the license, compact privilege or certification of any
individual who:

(i) Practices physical therapy or acts as a
physical therapist assistant in violation of the provisions
of this act or the physical therapy licensure compact under
W.S. 33-25-201 and 33-25-202;

(ii) Has practiced or attempts to practice fraud
or deceit in:

(A) Procuring or attempting to procure a
license, compact privilege or certificate;

(vii) Has had his license to practice physical
therapy, or certification to act as a physical therapist
assistant or compact privilege refused, revoked or
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
suspended or has had other disciplinary action taken in
another jurisdiction or country;

(xiii) Has knowingly engaged in an act which the
license, compact privilege or certificate holder knew was
beyond the scope of the individual's license, compact
privilege or certificate or performed acts without
sufficient education, knowledge or ability to competently
apply physical therapy principles and skills;

(xv) Knowingly fails to report to the board any
violation of this act, the physical therapy licensure
compact under W.S. 33-25-201 and 33-25-202 or rules and
regulations of the board;

(xvi) Violates any provisions of this act, the
physical therapy licensure compact under W.S. 33-25-201 and
33-25-202, rules and regulations of the board or lawfully
issued disciplinary order of the board;

(b) Upon receipt from the department of family
services of a certified copy of an order from a court to
withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196
the board or a compact privilege, the board shall notify
the party named in the court order of the withholding,
suspension or restriction of the license or compact
privilege in accordance with the terms of the court order.
No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act
shall be allowed for a license or compact privilege
withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

33-25-112. Hearing and appeal procedures.

(b) Except as provided by W.S. 33-25-111(b), all
board decisions concerning revocation or suspension of a
license, compact privilege or registration shall require an
affirmative vote of three (3) board members.

33-25-113. Fees.

(a) The board, pursuant to W.S. 33-1-201, shall
establish fees for examination, licensure or certification,
licensure or certification by endorsement, compact
privileges, renewal and reissuance.

33-25-116. Injunctive relief; grounds.
SF0172

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0196

(a) The board may petition in its own name for an
injunction to an appropriate court to enjoin:

(ii) Any license, compact privilege or
certificate holder who is in violation of this act or the
physical therapy licensure compact under W.S. 33-25-201 and
33-25-202 from practicing physical therapy;

(iii) Any person, firm, corporation,
institution, association, business or other entity from
employing any individual to practice physical therapy who
is not licensed or certified as required by this act or who
has not been granted a compact privilege.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0172